Massachusetts, session 194th, H2107.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 151 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “It”, in line 1, and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- Notwithstanding the provisions of section 27C of chapter 29 or any
other general or special law to the contrary, it.
SECTION 2. section 1 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
inserting before the word “employer”, in line 2, the following words:- public or private.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out
the figure “$15.00” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $16.25.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the figure “$16.25”, inserted by section 2, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $17.50.
of 4

SECTION 5. Section 1 of chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the figure “$17.50”, inserted by section 4, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $18.75.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the figure “$18.75”, inserted by section 5, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $20.00.
SECTION 7. Chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking section
1 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 1. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 27C of chapter 29 or any other
general or special law to the contrary, it is hereby declared to be against public policy for any
public or private employer to employ any person in an occupation in this commonwealth at an
oppressive and unreasonable wage as defined in section 2, and any contract, agreement or
understanding for or in relation to such employment shall be null and void. Annually on
September 30 the executive office of labor and workforce development shall calculate an
adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing the current
year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be
calculated to the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers or a successor index, for the 12 months prior to each September 1st as calculated by the
United States department of labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
section shall take effect on the following January 1.
of 4

SECTION 8. Section 7 of said chapter 151, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 33, the figure “$6.75” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $7.92.
SECTION 9. Section 7 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the figure “$7.92”, inserted by section 8, and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- $9.19.
SECTION 10. Section 7 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out the figure “$9.19”, inserted by section 9, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $10.55.
SECTION 11. Section 7 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out the figure “$10.55”, inserted by section 10, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $12.00.
SECTION 12. Section 7 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking the figure “$12.00”, inserted by section 11, and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “60 per cent of the minimum wage as determined by the executive office of
labor and workforce development pursuant to section 1 of this chapter”.
SECTION 13. Section 3 and section 8 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 14. Section 4 and section 9 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 15. Section 5 and section 10 shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
SECTION 16. Section 6 and section 11 shall take effect on January 1, 2029.
of 4

SECTION 17. Section 7 and section 12 shall take effect on January 1, 2030.
SECTION 18. On September 30, 2029 the executive office of labor and workforce
development shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing
power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The adjusted
minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent using the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers or a successor index, for the 12 months prior to
September 1, 2029 as calculated by the United States department of labor. The adjusted
minimum wage rate calculated under this section shall take effect on January 1, 2030.
of 4